Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4039
Taxes.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise
provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority with
respect to taxes authorizes the agent to:

(1) Prepare, sign, and
file federal, state, local, and foreign income, gift, payroll, property, Federal
Insurance Contributions Act, and other tax returns, claims for refunds, requests
for extension of time, petitions regarding tax matters, and any other tax-related
documents, including receipts, offers, waivers, consents, including consents
and agreements under section 2032A of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C.
2032A, closing agreements, and any power of attorney required by the Internal
Revenue Service or other taxing authority with respect to a tax year upon
which the statute of limitations has not run and the following twenty-five
tax years;

(2)
Pay taxes due, collect refunds, post bonds, receive confidential information,
and contest deficiencies determined by the Internal Revenue Service or other
taxing authority;

(3)
Exercise any election available to the principal under federal, state, local,
or foreign tax law; and

(4)
Act for the principal in all tax matters for all periods before the Internal
Revenue Service or other taxing authority.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 39.